Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2907
Evaluation, defined.

Evaluation means the process of making clinical judgments based on data gathered from examination of a patient.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 125;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,369;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1000.